Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 8. PUBLIC RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

SUBTITLE D. JUDICIAL RETIREMENT SYSTEM OF TEXAS PLAN ONE

CHAPTER 832. MEMBERSHIP

SUBCHAPTER A. MEMBERSHIP

Sec. 832.001. ELIGIBILITY FOR MEMBERSHIP. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), membership in the retirement system is limited to persons who have never been eligible for membership in the Judicial Retirement System of Texas Plan Two and who, before the date the Judicial Retirement System of Texas Plan Two began operation, became judges, justices, and commissioners of:

(1) the supreme court;

(2) the court of criminal appeals;

(3) courts of appeals;

(4) district courts; and

(5) commissions to a court specified in this subsection.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 15.03(4), eff. September 1, 2019.

(c) Membership in the retirement system is mandatory for eligible persons.

(d) Membership in the retirement system begins on the first day an eligible person holds a judicial office specified in Subsection (a).

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 602, Sec. 9, Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 42.001 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 15.03(4), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 832.002. MEMBERSHIP FEE. (a) Each member of the retirement system annually shall pay the system a membership fee of $10. A contributing member shall pay the fee with the member's first contribution to the retirement system in each fiscal year in the manner provided by Section 835.101 for payment of the member's contribution to the retirement system.

(b) If the membership fee is not paid with the member's first contribution of the fiscal year to the retirement system, the board of trustees may deduct the amount of the fee from that contribution or from any benefit to which the member becomes entitled.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 602, Sec. 10, Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 42.002 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1310, Sec. 53, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 832.003. TERMINATION OF MEMBERSHIP. A person terminates membership in the retirement system by:

(1) death;

(2) retirement based on service credited in the retirement system; or

(3) withdrawal of the person's contributions to the retirement system.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 42.003 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 832.004. WITHDRAWAL OF CONTRIBUTIONS. (a) If a member resigns a judicial office or otherwise ceases to be a judicial officer, the member may withdraw all of the member's contributions to the retirement system.

(b) A withdrawal of contributions cancels the person's service credit in the retirement system.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 42.004 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER B. RESUMPTION OF JUDICIAL SERVICE BY RETIREE

Sec. 832.101. INELIGIBILITY FOR MEMBERSHIP. A retiree who makes an election under Subchapter C of Chapter 74 may not rejoin the retirement system or receive credit in the retirement system for the period of an appointment or for any service performed under assignment.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1876, ch. 453, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 602, Sec. 11, Sept. 1, 1985. Renumbered from Vernon's Ann.Civ.St. Title 110B, Sec. 42.103 and amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 179, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 4.01, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 832.102. RESUMPTION OF FULL-TIME JUDICIAL SERVICE. (a) A retiree who resumes service as a judicial officer other than by appointment or assignment described in Section 832.101 may not rejoin or receive credit in the retirement system for the resumed service.

(b) The retirement system shall suspend annuity payments to a retiree who resumes service described by this section. A suspension of payments begins on the date a retiree takes the oath of office and ends on a date when:

(1) the retiree no longer holds the office; and

(2) the retiree, or the retiree's beneficiary if the retiree has died, has applied to the retirement system for resumption of payments.

(c) Time during which annuity payments are suspended as provided by this section does not reduce the number of months payments are to be made under an optional benefit plan providing for a specific amount of benefits for a guaranteed number of months after retirement.

(d) Before a retiree takes the oath of office for a position as a judicial officer other than under appointment or assignment described by Section 832.101, the retiree shall notify the retirement system in writing of the resumption of office and the projected dates of service.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 586, Sec. 35, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.